Washington statutes.
RCW 35.22.210

Separate designation of councilmembers in certain first-class cities.

Any city of the first class having a population less than one hundred thousand by the last federal census and having a charter providing that each of its councilmembers shall be the commissioner of an administrative department of such city, may by ordinance provide for the separate designation of such councilmembers as officers, in accordance with such administrative departments, and for their filing for and election to office under such separate designations.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2045; 1965 c 7 s 35.22.210. Prior: 1925 ex.s. c 61 s 1; RRS s 8948-1.]